Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.120

Shareholder dissent—Payment of fair value, when.

In addition to the corporate actions set forth in RCW 23B.13.020(1), a shareholder is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment of the fair value of the shareholder's shares in the event of, any of the following corporate actions:

(1) An election by a corporation to become a social purpose corporation, which has become effective, to which the corporation is a party if shareholder approval was required for the election by RCW 23B.25.130 or the articles of incorporation;

(2) An election to cease to be a social purpose corporation, which has become effective, to which the corporation is a party if shareholder approval was required for the election by RCW 23B.25.140 or the articles of incorporation, and the shareholder was entitled to vote on the election; and

(3) An amendment of the social purpose corporation's articles of incorporation that would materially change one or more of the social purposes of the corporation.

[ 2012 c 215 s 13.]